th: ประเภทคอนโซล: แบบมือถือ; บ้าน; ไฮบริด; ไมโครคอนโซลแบบเสียบและเล่น; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de consola: Dispositivo portátil; Casa; Híbrido; Micro consola plug-and-play; Outro
ro-RO: Tip consolă: De mână; Locuință; Hibrid; Micro consolă plug-and-play; Altele
hu: Konzoltípus: Kézi; Otthon; Hibrid; Plug-and-play mikrokonzol; Egyéb
ru: Тип консоли: Вручную; Дом; Гибридные; Микроконсоль plug-and-play; Другой
da: Konsoltype: Håndholdt; Hjem; Hybrid; Plug-and-play mikrokonsol; Andet
fr: Type de console: Portatif; Maison; Hybride; Micro console prête à jouer; Autre
zh-TW: 遊戲機類型: 手持式; 家; 混合; 隨插即玩微型主機; 其他
fi: Konsolin tyyppi: Kädessä pidettävä; Koti; Hybridi; Kytke ja pelaa -mikrokonsoli; Muu
ko: 콘솔 유형: 휴대용; 집; 하이브리드; 플러그 앤 플레이 마이크로 콘솔; 기타
pl: Typ konsoli: Mobilny; Strona główna; Hybrydowy; Mikrokonsola plug-and-play; Inne
it: Tipo di console: A mano; Casa; Ibrido; Micro console plug-and-play; Altro
tr: Konsol tipi: Elde taşınan; Ev; Hibrit; Tak ve çalıştır mikro konsol; Diğer
sv: Konsoltyp: Handhållen; Hem; Hybrid; Plug-and-play mikrokonsol; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ konzoly: Ručný; Domáci; Hybridný; Mikrokonzola typu zapoj a hraj; Iné
el: Τύπος κονσόλας: Χειροκίνητη; Σπίτι; Υβριδικό; Plug-and-play μικροκονσόλα; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип конзола: Преносим; Домашен; Хибрид; Микро конзола plug-and-play; Други
sl-SI: Tip konzole: Ročna; Doma; Hibridni; Priključi in igraj mikro konzola; Drugo
de: Konsolentyp: Handgerät; Heim; Hybrid; Plug-and-Play-Mikrokonsole; Sonstiges
ja: コンソールタイプ: ハンドヘルド; 家; ハイブリッド; プラグアンドプレイマイクロコンソール; その他
pt-BR: Tipo de console: Portátil; Lar; Híbrido; Micro console plug-and-play; Outro
cs: Typ konzole: Ruční; Domov; Hybridní; Plug-and-play mikrokonzole; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta konzole: Ručno; Dom; Hibridni; Priključi i igraj mikro konzola; Ostalo
lt-LT: Konsolės tipas: Rankinis; Namų; Hibridinė; Prijunk ir žaisk mikro konsolė; Kita
nl: Console type: Handbediend; Thuis; Hybride; Plug-and-play-microconsole; Andere
en: Console type: Handheld; Home; Hybrid; Plug-and-play micro console; Other
nb: Konsolltype: Håndholdt; Hjem; Hybrid; Plug-and-play mikrokonsoll; Annet
zh-CN: 游戏机类型: 手持式; 家; 混合; 即插即玩微型主机; 其他
vi: Loại console: Cầm tay; Chỗ ở; Kết hợp; Máy chơi game cắm và chơi siêu nhỏ; Khác
es: Tipo de consola: Portátil; Hogar; Híbrido; Microconsola plug and play; Otros